Utah statutes.
58-47b-503.   Penalties.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), any individual who commits an act of unlawful conduct under Section 58-47b-501 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  Sexual conduct that violates Section 58-47b-501 and Title 76, Criminal Code, shall be subject to the applicable penalties in Title 76.

